Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1731
Offstreet parking; legislative findings and declarations.

(1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the great increase in the number of motor vehicles, including buses and trucks, has created hazards to life and property in cities of the metropolitan class in Nebraska.

(2) In order to remove or reduce the hazards of life and property and the inconvenience of congested traffic on the streets in such cities in this state, it is hereby deemed necessary and of general benefit to the entire State of Nebraska to provide means for such cities to own offstreet vehicle parking facilities exclusively for the parking of motor vehicles.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 314.
July 21, 2022